Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.100

Approval and filing.

The official bonds of officers shall be approved and filed as follows, to wit: The official bond of the secretary of state shall be approved by the governor and filed in the office of the state auditor. The official bonds of all other state officers required by law to give bonds, except as otherwise expressly provided by law, shall be approved by the governor and filed in the office of the secretary of state.

The official bonds of all county and township officers, except the county superintendent of schools, shall be approved by the board of county commissioners, if in session, and if not in session, by the chair of such board, and filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk of their respective counties: PROVIDED, That the bond of the county clerk shall be recorded in the office of the county auditor and filed in the office of the county treasurer.

[ 2012 c 117 s 99; 1955 c 157 s 11. Prior: 1890 p 35 s 5; RRS s 9934.]

NOTES:

Contractor's bonds: Chapter 39.08 RCW.

Official bonds—Payment of premiums: RCW 48.28.040.

Surety insurance: Chapter 48.28 RCW.